Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 4
RELEASE FROM CUSTODY PENDING
FINAL ADJUDICATION

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 RELEASE ON BAIL

PART 2 BAIL AFTER CONVICTION

PART 3 UNIFORM RENDITION
OF ACCUSED PERSONS ACT